en: Leather shoes
ar: أحذية جلدية
as: চামৰাৰ জোতা
az: Dəri ayaqqabılar
be: Скураныя туфлі
bg: Кожени обувки
bn: চামড়ার জুতা
cs: Kožené boty
da: Lædersko
de: Lederschuhe
el: Δερμάτινα παπούτσια
es: Zapatos de cuero
et: Nahast kingad
fa: کفش های چرمی
fi: Nahkakengät
fr: Paire de chaussures en cuir
ga: Bróga leathair
gu: ચામડાના જૂતા
hi: चमड़े के जूते
hr: Kožne cipele
hu: Bőrcipők
hy: Կաշվե կոշիկներ
id: Sepatu kulit
is: Leðurskór
it: Scarpe di pelle
ja: 革靴
jw: Sepatu kulit
ka: ტყავის ფეხსაცმელი
kk: Тері аяқ киім
km: ស្បែកជើងស្បែក
kn: ಚರ್ಮದ ಬೂಟುಗಳು
ko: 가죽 신발
ky: Булгаары бут кийим
lt: Odiniai batai
lv: Ādas apavi
mk: Кожни чевли
ml: തുകൽ പാദരക്ഷകൾ
mn: Савхин гутал
mr: चामड्याचे बूट
ms: Kasut kulit
mt: Żraben tal-ġilda
my: သားရေဖိနပ်
ne: छालाको जुत्ता
nl: Leren schoenen
no: Lærsko
or: ଚମଡ଼ା ଜୋତା
pa: ਚਮੜੇ ਦੇ ਜੁੱਤੇ
pl: Buty skórzane
ps: څرمن بوټان
pt: Sapatos de couro
ro: Pantofi de piele
ru: Кожаные туфли
sd: چمڙي جا بوٽ
si: සම් සපත්තු
sk: Kožené topánky
sl: Usnjeni čevlji
so: Kabo jilicsan
sq: Këpucë lëkure
sr: Кожне ципеле
sv: Läderskor
sw: Viatu vya ngozi
ta: தோல் காலணிகள்
te: తోలు చెప్పులు
tg: Туфлиҳои чармӣ
th: รองเท้าหนัง
tk: Deri köwüşler
tl: Sapatos na katad
tr: Deri ayakkabılar
uk: Шкіряні туфлі
ur: چمڑے کے جوتے
uz: Charm poyabzal
vi: Giày da
xh: Izihlangu zesikhumba
yo: Bàtà alawọ
zh: 皮鞋
zu: Izicathulo zesikhumba

en: Fabric shoes
ar: أحذية قماشية
as: কাপোৰৰ জোতা
az: Parça ayaqqabılar
be: Тканевыя туфлі
bg: Текстилни обувки
bn: কাপড়ের জুতা
cs: Látkové boty
da: Stofsko
de: Stoffschuhe
el: Υφασμάτινα παπούτσια
es: Zapatos de tela
et: Riidest kingad
fa: کفش پارچه ای
fi: Kangaskengät
fr: Paire de chaussures en tissu
ga: Bróga fabraice
gu: કાપડના જૂતા
hi: कपड़े के जूते
hr: Cipele od tkanine
hu: Szövet cipők
hy: Գործվածքե կոշիկներ
id: Sepatu kain
is: Dúkskór
it: Scarpe di tessuto
ja: 布の靴
jw: Sepatu kain
ka: ნაჭრის ფეხსაცმელი
kk: Мата аяқ киім
km: ស្បែកជើងក្រណាត់
kn: ಬಟ್ಟೆ ಬೂಟುಗಳು
ko: 천 신발
ky: Кездеме бут кийим
lt: Tekstiliniai batai
lv: Auduma apavi
mk: Чевли од ткаенина
ml: തുണികൊണ്ടുള്ള ഷൂസുകൾ
mn: Даавуун гутал
mr: कापडी शूज
ms: Kasut kain
mt: Żraben tad-drapp
my: အထည်ဖိနပ်
ne: कपडाको जुत्ता
nl: Stoffen schoenen
no: Tøysko
or: କପଡା ଜୋତା
pa: ਕੱਪੜੇ ਦੇ ਜੁੱਤੇ
pl: Buty z materiału
ps: ټوکر بوټان
pt: Sapatos de tecido
ro: Pantofi din material textil
ru: Тканевые туфли
sd: ڪپڙي جا بوٽ
si: රෙදි සපත්තු
sk: Látkové topánky
sl: Čevlji iz blaga
so: Kabo dhar ah
sq: Këpucë pëlhure
sr: Ципеле од тканине
sv: Tygskor
sw: Viatu vya kitambaa
ta: துணி காலணிகள்
te: గుడ్డ చెప్పులు
tg: Пойафзоли матоъӣ
th: รองเท้าผ้าใบ
tk: Mata köwüşler
tl: Sapatos na tela
tr: Kumaş ayakkabılar
uk: Тканинні туфлі
ur: کپڑے کے جوتے
uz: Mato poyabzal
vi: Giày vải
xh: Izihlangu zelaphu
yo: Bàtà asọ
zh: 布鞋
zu: Izicathulo zendwangu

en: Sport shoes
ar: أحذية رياضية
as: ক্ৰীড়াৰ জোতা
az: İdman ayaqqabıları
be: Спартыўныя чаравікі
bg: Спортни обувки
bn: খেলার জুতা
cs: Sportovní obuv
da: Sportssko
de: Sportschuhe
el: Αθλητικά παπούτσια
es: Zapatillas deportivas
et: Spordijalatsid
fa: کفش ورزشی
fi: Urheilukengät
fr: Paire de chaussures de sport
ga: Bróga spóirt
gu: રમતના જૂતા
hi: खेल के जूते
hr: Sportske cipele
hu: Sportcipők
hy: Սպորտային կոշիկներ
id: Sepatu olahraga
is: Íþróttaskór
it: Scarpe sportive
ja: 運動靴
jw: Sepatu olahraga
ka: სპორტული ფეხსაცმელი
kk: Спорттық аяқ киім
km: ស្បែកជើងកីឡា
kn: ಕ್ರೀಡಾ ಬೂಟುಗಳು
ko: 운동화
ky: Спорттук бут кийим
lt: Sportiniai batai
lv: Sporta apavi
mk: Спортски чевли
ml: സ്പോർട്സ് ഷൂസുകൾ
mn: Спортын гутал
mr: खेळाचे बूट
ms: Kasut sukan
mt: Żraben sportivi
my: အားကစားဖိနပ်
ne: खेलकुद जुत्ता
nl: Sportschoenen
no: Sportssko
or: କ୍ରୀଡା ଜୋତା
pa: ਖੇਡਾਂ ਦੇ ਜੁੱਤੇ
pl: Buty sportowe
ps: سپورټي بوټان
pt: Sapatos de desporto
ro: Pantofi sport
ru: Спортивная обувь
sd: راندين جا بوٽ
si: ක්රීඩා සපත්තු
sk: Športová obuv
sl: Športni čevlji
so: Kabaha isboortiga
sq: Këpucë sportive
sr: Спортске ципеле
sv: Sportskor
sw: Viatu vya michezo
ta: விளையாட்டு காலணிகள்
te: క్రీడా బూట్లు
tg: Кроссовкаҳо
th: รองเท้ากีฬา
tk: Sport köwüşleri
tl: Sapatos na pang-isports
tr: Spor ayakkabıları
uk: Спортивне взуття
ur: کھیلوں کے جوتے
uz: Sport poyabzali
vi: Giày thể thao
xh: Izihlangu zemidlalo
yo: Bata idaraya
zh: 运动鞋
zu: Izicathulo zezemidlalo

xx: Jeans
en: Jeans
fr: Jeans, Jean

en: Faux leather jacket
fr: Veste simili-cuir

en: Acrylic sweater
ar: سترة أكريليك
as: এক্ৰাইলিক চোৱেটাৰ
az: Akril sviter
be: Акрылавы швэдар
bg: Акрилен пуловер
bn: এক্রাইলিক সোয়েটার
cs: Akrylový svetr
da: Akryl sweater
de: Acrylpullover
el: Ακρυλικό πουλόβερ
es: Suéter acrílico
et: Akrüülkampsun
fa: ژاکت اکریلیک
fi: Akryylipusero
fr: Pull en acrylique
ga: Geansaí aicrileach
gu: એક્રેલિક સ્વેટર
hi: एक्रिलिक स्वेटर
hr: Akrilni džemper
hu: Akril pulóver
hy: Ակրիլային վերնաշապիկ
id: Sweter akrilik
is: Akrýlpeysa
it: Maglione acrilico
ja: アクリルセーター
jw: Sweter akrilik
ka: აკრილის სვიტერი
kk: Акрилді жемпір
km: អាវយឺតអាគ្រីលីក
kn: ಅಕ್ರಿಲಿಕ್ ಸ್ವೆಟರ್
ko: 아크릴 스웨터
ky: Акрил свитер
lt: Akrilinis megztinis
lv: Akrila džemperis
mk: Акрилен џемпер
ml: അക്രിലിക് സ്വെറ്റർ
mn: Нийлэг цамц
mr: ऍक्रेलिक स्वेटर
ms: Baju sejuk akrilik
mt: Ġerżi akriliku
my: အခရီလစ်ဆွယ်တာ
ne: एक्रिलिक स्वेटर
nl: Acryl trui
no: Akrylgenser
or: ଏକ୍ରିଲିକ୍ ସ୍ sweater େଟର୍
pa: ਐਕਰੀਲਿਕ ਸਵੈਟਰ
pl: Sweter akrylowy
ps: اکریلیک سویټر
pt: Camisola acrílica
ro: Pulover acrilic
ru: Акриловый свитер
sd: ايڪريلڪ سويٽر
si: ඇක්රිලික් ස්ෙවටර්
sk: Akrylový sveter
sl: Akrilni pulover
so: Suwitar akrilik ah
sq: Triko akrilik
sr: Акрилни џемпер
sv: Akryltröja
sw: Sweta ya akriliki
ta: அக்ரிலிக் ஸ்வெட்டர்
te: ఎక్రిలిక్ స్వెటర్
tg: Свитеры акрилӣ
th: เสื้อสเวตเตอร์อะคริลิค
tk: Akril switer
tl: Sweter na akrilik
tr: Akrilik kazak
uk: Акриловий светр
ur: ایکریلک سویٹر
uz: Akril sviter
vi: Áo len acrylic
xh: Ibhatyi ye-acrylic
yo: Siweta akiriliki
zh: 腈纶毛衣
zu: Ijezi le-acrylic

en: Cotton sweatshirt
fr: Sweat en coton

en: Waterproof jacket
fr: Veste imperméable

en: Viscose dress
fr: Robe en viscose

en: Scratch cards
fr: Jeux de grattage, jeu de grattage

en: Papers
da: Papirer
fr: Papiers
sv: Papper

en: Household chemicals
de: Haushaltschemikalien
es: Productos químicos domésticos
fr: Produits chimiques ménagers

en: Bleach
de: Bleichmittel
fr: Eau de Javel

en: Laundry detergents
de: Waschmittel
es: Detergentes para la ropa
fr: Lessives

en: Liquid detergent
de: Flüssigwaschmittel
es: Detergentes líquidos
fr: Lessives liquides

en: Dishwasher tablets
de: Geschirrspültabs
es: Pastillas para lavavajillas
fr: Tablettes pour lave-vaisselle

en: Detergents
de: Reinigungsmittel
es: Detergentes
fr: Détergents

en: Medicine
da: Medicin, lægemiddel
de: Medizin
es: Medicina
fr: Médicament
sv: Medicin, läkemedel